Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3963
Violations; penalties; unpaid assessment; late payment fee.

(1) Any person violating any of the provisions of the Dairy Industry Development Act shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

(2) Any unpaid assessment shall be increased one and one-half percent each month beginning with the day following the date such assessment was due. Any remaining amount due, including any unpaid charges previously made pursuant to this section, shall be increased at the same rate on the corresponding day of each succeeding month until paid.

(3) For purposes of this section, any assessment that was determined at a date later than prescribed by section 2-3959 because of the failure to submit a report to the board when due shall be considered to have been payable on the date it would have been due if the report had been timely filed. The timeliness of a payment to the board shall be based on the applicable postmarked date or the date actually received by the board, whichever is earlier. Any assessments and late payment fees may be recovered by action commenced by the board.

(4) The remedies provided in this section shall be in addition to and not exclusive of other remedies that may be available by law or in equity.

Laws 1992, LB 275, § 16.